Utah statutes.
13-16-10.   Recordkeeping -- Civil penalty.

(1)  Persons engaged in commerce within this state who sell motor fuel in this state shall maintain records accurately indicating the date and the time of day of each change in the sale price of motor fuel and the identity of the person who recorded the price change.  In the event the change in price is to meet a lower price of a competitor, the record shall set forth the competitor by name and address, specifying the price which was met.  These records shall be maintained for a period of two years.

(2)  The records shall be made available to the attorney general on request.

(3)  A person who fails to comply with Subsection (1) is liable to the state for a civil penalty, assessed by a court, of $500 per day for each business location where a violation occurred.

